California, session 20252026, AB954.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14524.4 of the Government Code is amended to read:14524.4. (a) On or before June 30, 2015, the department shall submit to the commission for approval an interregional transportation strategic plan directed at achieving a high functioning and balanced interregional transportation system. The plan shall be action oriented and pragmatic, considering both the short-term and long-term future, and shall present clear, concise policy guidance to the department for managing the state’s transportation system.(b) The interregional transportation strategic plan shall be consistent with the California Transportation Plan as updated pursuant to Section 65071.(c) To the extent feasible and consistent with the California Transportation Plan, the department shall assess incorporating bicycle highways into strategic interregional corridors within the interregional transportation strategic plan.SECTION 1.Section 14526.1 is added to the Government Code, to read:14526.1.(a)(1)The department shall prepare a proposal for the development, including the selection, of sites for a pilot program establishing branded networks of bicycle highways that are numbered and signed within two of California’s major metropolitan areas in different regions of the state.(2)The pilot program shall restrict use of a network to bicyclists, and ensure the network contains intermittent entrances and exits, serves trips of 5 miles or more, and supports higher speed travel of up to 25 miles per hour.(3)The department shall select the sites for the pilot program based on regional support, connectivity to other bike routes, and potential to maximize active transportation and its associated benefits.(b)(1)On or before January 1, 2030, the department shall include the proposal prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) in the draft interregional transportation improvement program described in Section 14526. The department shall perform all other actions necessary for the proposal to be programmed in the state transportation improvement program, including, but not limited to, developing a project study report or major investment study.(2)Notwithstanding subdivisions (a), (b), and (e) of Section 14526, the proposal described in subdivision (a) shall be eligible for inclusion in the draft interregional transportation improvement program described in Section 14526.(c)On or before July 1, 2031, the department shall report to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature on the status of the pilot program and recommendations for the development of additional networks of bicycle highways.(d)(1)A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.(2)Pursuant to Section 10231.5, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2035, and, as of January 1, 2036, is repealed.